Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145A.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Epinephrine. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "predosed form of epinephrine" means a single-use device that is approved by the Food and Drug Administration, contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine, and is used to administer epinephrine to the human body to prevent a life-threatening allergic reaction. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 151.37, a local health department may obtain and possess a predosed form of epinephrine and distribute the predosed form of epinephrine to locations in the community health services area served by the local health department. A predosed form of epinephrine distributed under this paragraph may be administered to an individual if, in good faith, it is determined that the individual is experiencing a life-threatening allergic reaction. The administration of a predosed form of epinephrine under this paragraph is not the practice of medicine. new text end new text begin (c) At the request of a community health board, the commissioner must provide the local health departments governed by the community health board with a standing order for distribution of a predosed form of epinephrine. The commissioner must identify and make available to local health departments resources and training materials on maintaining and administering the predosed form of epinephrine covered by the standing order. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145A.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Vaccines. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 151.37, a local health department may obtain and possess vaccines required under section 121A.15 and Minnesota Rules, chapter 4604, in order to enroll or remain enrolled in an elementary or secondary school or child care facility; influenza vaccines; COVID-19 vaccines; and other vaccines as determined by the local health department. An advanced practice nurse, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse employed by or under contract with the local health department may administer, according to a condition-specific protocol as authorized under section 148.235, subdivision 9, vaccines obtained by a local health department under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) At the request of a community health board, the commissioner must provide the local health departments governed by the community health board with a standing order for distribution of the vaccines identified by the local health department according to paragraph (a). new text end